Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-752
Joint city and county facilities; authorization; vote required.

Any action authorized under section 15-751 shall be taken only upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the board of commissioners of such county or a majority of the members of the city council and mayor of such city and when such action is taken by such governing body it shall be binding upon all officers and employees of such county or such city.

Laws 1957, c. 25, § 2, p. 179.